skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/an__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>A</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANam</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Anam</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Anam</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FA</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aByAm</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aBiH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Fe</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aByAm</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aByaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aByAm</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aByaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FoH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FAm</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Fi</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>FoH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>aRu</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>asu</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>asu</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnO</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>ANaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AnaH</l><r>an<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/an__nm"/></e>
